Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-302
County and city of metropolitan or primary class; assistance to enforce zoning and subdivision regulations; assess cost.

Effective July 1, 1976, a county government, city of the metropolitan class, or city of the primary class that is enforcing zoning and subdivision regulations shall, upon request, provide either directly or through an intergovernmental program all the necessary services and staff to assist villages and cities of the second class that are located wholly or partially within the county with the enforcement of their individual zoning and subdivision regulations, and such assistance may, at the option of the county, city of the metropolitan class, or city of the primary class, also be rendered to cities of the first class upon request. The county or municipality may assess the full costs of such assistance to a municipality served. The county or municipality providing the service may require a one-year notice before beginning or terminating such services.

Laws 1975, LB 317, § 3;

Laws 1979, LB 412, § 23;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 84-153;

Laws 1985, LB 421, § 4.